test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s2x1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - mæla: # 
    mæla+V+Inf: mæla
    mæla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: mælir
    mæla+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: mældi
    mæla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [mæltu, mældu]
    mæla+V+Sup: mælt
    mæla+V+PrfPrc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: mældur
